California statutes. Public Resources Code
The department is authorized to conduct surveys, studies, and research concerning the economic and environmental costs, benefits, and feasibility of utilizing wood wastes and forest growth for thermal processes, including, but not limited to, the generation of electrical energy or conversion to solid, gaseous, or liquid fuels for transport or industrial use. Such studies shall include research concerning the cost of gathering and transporting logging wastes and other materials from timber management operations to potential markets and the identification of locations for conversion facilities and forest management operations with high potential for utilization of wood for energy production.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.15.

The department is further authorized to provide technical and other assistance to public and private agencies and persons with respect to forest management, species selection, and other matters as to which the department has special expertise, in order to encourage and facilitate utilization of wood for energy production.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.16.

The department shall coordinate its activities and cooperate with the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission in the development of surveys, studies, and research concerning the utilization of wood waste and forest growth for energy. The department shall also coordinate its activities with other public and private agencies to insure that the activities of the department and such other agencies are not duplicative and the maximum benefit occurs from actions taken by the department to carry out its responsibilities pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Timberland Wildlife Study [4800. - 4805.]

4800.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to do all of the following:

(a) To provide coordination on wildlife and timberland issues within the Resources Agency.

(b) To improve and coordinate the state data bases for use in analyzing the cumulative impacts of timber harvesting pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(c) To improve the technical basis upon which the Department of Fish and Game predicates recommendations for mitigating site-specific and cumulative effects on wildlife from timber harvesting activities.

(d) To provide recommendations to the board concerning creation of a list of species of special concern for which additional forest practices rules may be needed.

(e) To provide recommendations to the Fish and Game Commission concerning additions to its list of species that are threatened or endangered.

(f) To provide authority to the state to work cooperatively with the United States Forest Service, including the ability to provide and receive funding for wildlife studies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1241, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4805.

(a) The director shall establish a schedule of user fees for persons using the department’s data base developed pursuant to Section 4802, which does not exceed the reasonable costs for developing, updating, and maintaining the data base.

(b) The department shall utilize its data base for the review of timber harvesting plans as appropriate, and shall permit the use of its data base by timber harvesting plan applicants for the preparation of timber harvesting plans and by other persons, upon request.

(c) Commencing on January 1, 1992, the department shall charge a fee to users of the data base pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1241, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Good Neighbor Authority Program [4810. - 4812.]

4810.

For purpose of this chapter, the following terms shall apply:

(a) “Agreement” means the Good Neighbor Authority Agreement entered into between the state and the federal government pursuant to Section 2113a of Title 16 of the United States Code.

(b) “Forest collaborative” means a functioning collaborative group that includes multiple persons or entities representing diverse interests, that is transparent and inclusive, and that has sufficient expertise, capacity, and scientific support to effectively plan, implement, and monitor landscape-level, ecological-based forest restoration activities.

(c) “Fund” means the Good Neighbor Authority Fund, established as
 specified in Section 4811.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 232, Sec. 2.   (AB 697)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4811.

(a) There is continued in existence in the State Treasury the Good Neighbor Authority Fund, originally established pursuant to Chapter 18 of the Statutes of 2020. The fund shall be administered by the department under the direction of the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. The moneys in the fund shall be available for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, and as authorized by Section 2113a(b)(2) of Title 16 of the United States Code, and to the extent not in conflict with federal law or agreements, for state departments or agencies to undertake forest health and fuels reduction projects on federal lands executed through these agreements, and to fund costs associated with planning, implementing, and maintaining these projects, including administrative and operational costs.

(b) The fund shall be the depository for revenues derived from the sale of forest products, as defined in Section 4638, from federal lands, as authorized by Section 2113a(b)(2) of Title 16 of the United States Code, and to the extent not in conflict with federal law or agreements, to support the activities described in subdivision (a).

(c) State departments or agencies engaged in agreements may accept grants and donations, including, but not limited to, donations of equipment, seedlings, labor, materials, or funds from any source for the purpose of supporting or facilitating activities undertaken pursuant to this section. Funds received pursuant to this subdivision shall be transferred to the department and deposited into the fund for use by state departments or agencies engaged in agreements to support the activities described in subdivision (a) at the direction of the Secretary of
 the Natural Resources Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 232, Sec. 3.   (AB 697)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4812.

(a) Under an agreement between the state and the federal government, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall establish a program for purposes of conducting ecological restoration and fire resiliency projects on national forest lands, with priority given to forest restoration and fuels reduction projects that are landscape scale and are focused on ecological restoration and to community fire protection and protection of water and other infrastructure. Projects shall be based on the best available science and shall emphasize the use of prescribed fire where appropriate. Projects with multiple benefits shall be prioritized, as applicable and feasible. Eligible activities under the program, consistent with Section 2113a of Title 16 of the United States Code, any other federal law, and the agreement, may
 include any of the following:

(1) The development of federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) documents, and documents prepared pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(2) Other activities related to project planning, such as preparation of resource surveys, analyses, and reports.

(3) Implementation and maintenance of selected projects, including ecological thinning, prescribed fire, replanting, and related activities necessary to carry out authorized restoration services pursuant to an agreement.

(b) Projects subject to this chapter shall be designed, to the extent feasible, to do the following:

(1) Prevent type conversion and the spread of invasive plants and grasses.

(2) Based upon the best available science, provide for ecological restoration and fire resiliency projects appropriate to the landscape and vegetation being treated.

(3) Provide ecologically appropriate treatment for native shrublands, such as chaparral and coastal sage scrub, including the removal of flammable nonnative invasive species and the restoration of native species, where appropriate.

(c) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency may contract with Native American tribes, state agencies, local governments, special districts, forest collaboratives, resource conservation districts, private entities, and qualified nongovernmental organizations to assist in planning, implementing, and maintaining landscape scale
 restoration projects on national forest lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 232, Sec. 4.   (AB 697)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. LUMBER, LOGS AND TIMBER [4851. - 4879.]



  CHAPTER 1. Floating Lumber [4851. - 4855.]

4851.

As used in this article, “lumber” means all timber, whether in logs, boards, planks, or beams, and whether in rafts or otherwise. It does not include the sort of wood commonly called driftwood.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.

Whenever any lumber drifts upon any island in any of the waters of this state, or upon the bank of any such waters, the owner of the lumber may remove it on payment or tendering to the owner or occupant of the land the amount of the damages which the owner or occupant of the land has sustained by reason of the drifting of the lumber upon such land, and which may accrue in its removal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.

If the owner of the lumber does not, within three months from the time it was so drifted, take the lumber away, the owner or occupant of the land shall deliver a bill of his charges, together with the lumber, to the sheriff of the county. The sheriff shall dispose of the lumber in the manner required by Articles 1 (commencing with Section 510) and 2 (commencing with Section 530) of Chapter 3, Division 3 of the Harbors and Navigation Code with regard to wrecked perishable property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.

When sold, the proceeds of the lumber shall be applied first to the payment of the charges of sale and in liquidation of the expenses and damages awarded to the claimant. The residue shall be paid to the county treasurer, to be by the county treasurer paid over to the former owner of the lumber, or the former owner’s representatives, or assigns, on the production of proof of
 their former ownership satisfactory to the judge of the superior court of the county, and on the judge’s order therefor, made within one year after its receipt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 95.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4855.

The rejection by the judge of any claimant’s right to the proceeds is conclusive, unless within six months thereafter the claimant commences action to obtain the proceeds. If no claim is made or sustained to the proceeds, the county treasurer shall place the proceeds in the county unapportioned elementary school fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 96.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Marking Logs and Timber [4875. - 4879.]

4875.

In all cases where two or more persons, firms, or corporations are engaged in or intend to engage in putting or placing logs or timber into any navigable water in this state for the purpose of rafting or floating such logs or timber to any place within this state for manufacture or sale and where such logs are to be rafted or floated a distance of one mile or more, such person, firm or corporation may have some mark of his or its selection and authenticated as provided in this chapter impressed in a conspicuous place on the end or surface of each such log or piece of timber.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4877.

Any log or timber which has any such recorded mark impressed on it shall be presumed to belong to the person, firm, or corporation in whose name the mark has been recorded.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4878.

Every person, firm, or corporation that neglects to have his or its mark or marks recorded, as provided by Section 4875, is debarred from all benefits arising from the recordings of the mark or marks, and the vendee or assignee of any such logs or timber is subject to the same regulations and restrictions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, except boom companies which may be required or compelled to catch and hold logs or timber, to take up or have in their possession, or to sell, dispose of, or convert or appropriate to their own use, without the written consent of the owner or his agent, any marked log, timber, pole, pile, tie, shingle bolt, boom stick, or lumber of value, not the property of such person, firm or corporation, found on the bank or banks of, or adrift, or strayed in, any harbor, river, lake, bay, slough, bayou, creek, pond, stream, ditch or other waters situated wholly or partly within the boundaries of this state, if the person or company claiming such mark has had a description and diagram of it recorded in any of the counties of this state through which such property was to be floated for manufacture or sale. Knowledge of the ownership of all such logs, timber, or lumber for the purpose of this chapter shall be conclusively presumed upon proof that the logs, timber or lumber were marked and that the description and diagram had been theretofore recorded. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine not exceeding six hundred dollars ($600), or by imprisonment for not more than one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 343.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. CONSERVATION AND TRAINING PROGRAM [4951. - 4958.]



  CHAPTER 1. California Conservation Camp Program [4951. - 4958.]

4951.

In enacting this chapter, it is the purpose of the Legislature to declare the existence of a California Conservation Camp program to provide for the training and use of the inmates and wards assigned to conservation camps in the furtherance of public conservation.

It is the policy of this state to require the inmates and wards assigned to such camps to perform public conservation projects including, but not limited to, forest fire prevention and control, forest and watershed management, recreation, fish and game management, soil conservation and forest and watershed revegetation.

In order to effect the maximum possible conservation and development of natural resources for the benefit of the people of this state, whenever reasonably possible, conservation projects of a multiple purpose nature shall be undertaken by the California Conservation Camps. The various agencies concerned with conservation projects shall consult and advise with each other to promote these multiple-purpose conservation projects and in order to achieve this goal may enter into such contracts as may be necessary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4952.

As used in this chapter “California Conservation Camps” or “camps” means any camps now or hereafter established, as provided by law, for the purpose of receiving prisoners committed to the custody of the Director of Corrections and wards committed to the Director of the Youth Authority, and in which the work projects performed by the inmates or wards are supervised by employees of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4953.

(a) The department shall utilize inmates and wards assigned to conservation camps in performing fire prevention, fire control, and other work of the department. At times it deems proper and on terms it deems wise, the department may enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with a public agency, local, state, or federal, or with a qualified nonprofit organization that has a demonstrated ability to plan, implement, and complete a conservation project and meets other criteria, as determined by the department, for the performance of other conservation projects that are appropriate for those public agencies or that nonprofit organization under policies that shall be established by the
 California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority. The charge for the service shall be determined by the director. All these contracts are subject to the approval of the director and the Director of General Services.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “nonprofit organization” means any California corporation exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(5) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 67.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4956.

The conditions of work to be performed under such contracts or agreements shall be consistent with the requirements, as determined by the Director of Corrections and the Director of the Youth Authority, for maintaining control of inmates or wards committed to their respective custody.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4957.

Conservation camp inmates and wards may be utilized in the rescue of lost or injured persons, the saving of life, and the protection of property. The department may cooperate with local agencies of government to accomplish these purposes.

The department may also, upon the request of the appropriate local agency, utilize conservation camp inmates and wards in the performance of watershed revegetation and related work necessary to prevent flood damage to land resulting from the destruction of vegetation by fire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1277, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

4958.

Conservation camp inmates and wards may, upon the request of the appropriate public agency, be utilized in the performance of preventive maintenance or reconstruction of levees or of any other work necessary to prevent flood damage to land resulting from levee breaks or overflows.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 732, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. PARKS AND MONUMENTS [5001. - 5877.]



CHAPTER 1. State Parks and Monuments [5001. - 5077.8.]



  ARTICLE 1. State Park System [5001. - 5019.5.]

5001.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California’s state parks are a true reflection of our state’s collective history, natural and cultural heritage, and ideals. The state parks can be models of healthy, natural, and sustainable ecosystems and they can also commemorate important cultural traditions or historic events.
 To remain relevant now and into the future, state parks must protect California’s heritage and be welcoming in order that visitors may understand and appreciate these special places that have been set aside for their inspiration and enjoyment.

(2) The state parks and other nature, recreation, and historic areas deserve to be preserved and managed for the benefit and inspiration of all state residents and visitors to the state parks. It is the intent of the Legislature to clarify the priorities and responsibilities of state agencies with respect to the management and administration of the state park system.

(3) Individual units of the state park system derive increased importance and recognition through their inclusion in a unified state park system that is preserved and managed for the benefit and inspiration of all Californians and visitors to the state.

(b) The Department of Parks and Recreation has control of the state park system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 573, Sec. 4.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.1.

As used in this division, “department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation and “director” means the Director of Parks and Recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.2.

The director shall promote and regulate the use of the state park system in a manner that conserves the scenery, natural and historic resources, and wildlife in the individual units of the system for the enjoyment of future generations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 573, Sec. 5.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.3.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Event” means a competition event that uses lands or facilities under the jurisdiction of the department.

(2) “Prize compensation” includes prize or purse money, other prizes, goods, or other compensation.

(b) The department, for any event that awards prize compensation to competitors in gendered categories, shall require as a condition of a
 special event permit that, for any participant level that receives prize compensation, the prize compensation for each gendered category be identical at each participant level. The department shall not approve a special event permit for an event that does not comply with this condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.   (AB 467)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.4.

The department may manage state marine reserves, state marine parks, state marine conservation areas, state marine cultural preservation areas, state marine recreational management areas and, if requested by the State Water Resources Control Board, state water quality protection areas. Department authority over units within the state park system shall extend to units of the state MMAs system that are managed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 610, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.5.

Whenever any reference is made to the state park system with respect to a duty, power, purpose, responsibility, or jurisdiction that can be exercised or carried out within the state vehicular recreation areas, it shall be deemed to be also a reference to, and to mean, the state vehicular recreation areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5001.95, units of the state park system may be located within, and be a part of, a state seashore. However, the unit shall be managed in accordance with its classification as provided in Section 5019.62.

(b) The following state seashores are hereby established consisting of appropriate coastal lands described in this subdivision together with any other lands that may, from time to time, be acquired by the state as an addition to these state
 seashores:

(1) Del Norte State Seashore, consisting of lands lying between Pyramid Point and Point Saint George, particularly lands to assure public access to, and scenic protection of, Pyramid Point; beach and dune lands, water-bottom and shoreline lands at Lake Earl, including Lake Talawa, all within Del Norte County.

(2) Clem Miller State Seashore, consisting of lands extending from the mouth of the Eel River to Pudding Creek at Fort Bragg, and including lands at Bear Harbor, Usal Creek, Cottoneva Creek, shore and upland additions to Westport-Union Landing State Beach, DeHaven Creek uplands, Ten Mile River estuary, and MacKerricher State Park, all within Humboldt and Mendocino Counties.

(3) Mendocino Coast State Seashore, consisting of lands extending from Jughandle Creek to the Gualala River, and including the
 Pygmy Forest Ecological Staircase, Russian Gulch State Park, Mendocino Headlands State Park, Van Damme State Park, Greenwood Creek Beach, Bowling Ball Beach and the Gualala River shoreline and estuary, all within Mendocino County.

(4) Sonoma Coast State Seashore, consisting of lands extending from the Gualala River to Bodega Head, and including the Kruse Rhododendron State Reserve, Salt Point State Park, Fort Ross State Historic Park, and Sonoma Coast State Beach, all within Sonoma County.

(5) Año Nuevo State Seashore, consisting of lands extending from Pillar Point to the City of Santa Cruz, and including the San Mateo Coast State Beaches, Año Nuevo State Reserve, Big Basin Redwoods State Park, and Natural Bridges State Beach, all within San Mateo and Santa Cruz Counties.

(6) (A) Monterey Bay
 State Seashore, consisting of lands extending from Natural Bridges State Beach south to Point Joe, including Lighthouse Fields, Twin Lakes, New Brighton State Beach, Seacliff, Manresa, Sunset, Zmudowski, Moss Landing, Salinas River, Marina, Monterey, and Asilomar, all within Santa Cruz and Monterey Counties.

(B) The department may establish a recreational trail system within the boundaries of the Monterey Bay State Seashore that is to be dedicated as the Sam Farr Recreational Trail System.

(7) San Luis Obispo State Seashore, consisting of lands extending from Cayucos to Lion’s Head and including Cayucos State Beach, Morro Strand State Beach, Atascadero State Beach, Morro Bay State Park, Montana de Oro State Park, Avila State Beach, Pismo State Beach, Pismo Dunes State Vehicular Recreation Area and Point Sal State Beach, all within San Luis Obispo and Santa Barbara Counties.

(8) Santa Barbara Coast State Seashore, consisting of lands extending from Gaviota to Las Llagas Canyon, and including Gaviota State Park, Refugio State Beach, and El Capitan State Beach, all within Santa Barbara County.

(9) Point Mugu State Seashore, consisting of lands extending from Ormond Beach to San Nicholas Canyon, and including Mugu Lagoon, Point Mugu State Park, and Leo Carrillo State Beach, all within Ventura and Los Angeles Counties.

(10) Capistrano Coast State Seashore, consisting of lands extending from Newport Beach to San Mateo Point, and including Corona Del Mar State Beach, Irvine Coast, Doheny State Beach, and San Clemente State Beach, all within Orange County. 

(11) (A) San Diego Coast State Seashore, consisting of
 lands extending from San Onofre State Beach to La Jolla, and including San Onofre State Beach, Carlsbad State Beach, Robert C. Frazee State Beach, South Carlsbad State Beach, Leucadia State Beach, Moonlight State Beach, San Elijo State Beach, Cardiff State Beach, Torrey Pines State Beach, and Torrey Pines State Reserve, all within San Diego County. 

(B) That section of Carlsbad State Beach within the San Diego Coast State Seashore that is located north of Agua-Hedionda Lagoon is hereby renamed Robert C. Frazee State Beach.

(c) The department shall determine the precise boundaries of each state seashore, may revise those boundaries from time to time, and shall identify additional lands appropriate for inclusion in state seashores.

(d) Section 5019.62 does not apply to lands lying within the boundaries of state
 seashores established pursuant to this section until those lands have been acquired by the state and designated as state park system lands that are a part of a state seashore.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 953, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.65.

(a) Commercial exploitation of resources in units of the state park system is prohibited, except all of the following is permissible:

(1) Slant or directional drilling for oil or gas with the intent of extracting deposits underlying the Tule Elk State Reserve in Kern County in accordance with Section 6854.

(2) Commercial fishing, unless otherwise restricted, in state marine conservation areas, state marine cultural preservation areas, and state marine recreational management areas.

(3) (A) The commercialization of investigation results, provided that commercialization is consistent with the requirements of Section 5001.67.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “investigation results” means the results of scientific research, scientific investigation, or the progeny of biological samples collected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5001.67.

(b) The taking of mineral specimens for recreational purposes from state beaches, state recreation areas, or state vehicular recreation areas is permitted upon receiving prior approval of the
 director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 477, Sec. 1.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.67.

(a) Qualified institutions and individuals shall be encouraged to conduct nondestructive forms of scientific investigation within state park system units, upon receiving prior approval from the director.

(b) An applicant may commercialize
 particular investigation results only if the applicant has completed both of the following:

(1) Published or otherwise placed into the public domain the investigation results.

(2) (A) Entered into a benefits sharing agreement issued pursuant to this paragraph.

(B) A benefits sharing agreement shall be limited to the particular investigation results and the specific commercial
 application identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(C) A benefits sharing agreement shall describe the department’s
 equitable compensable interest in the commercial application of the particular investigation results. Among other considerations, this may include monetary and nonmonetary benefits provided to the department resulting from the commercial application identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(D) A benefits sharing agreement shall not be approved solely for its revenue-producing potential.

(c) The director, in the director’s discretion, may enter into a benefits sharing agreement with an applicant for purposes of subdivision (b) if the applicant has taken the following actions:

(1) Identified the commercial application and the particular investigation results to be used in the commercial application.

(2) Described how the commercial application identified pursuant to paragraph (1) will provide a compelling public benefit to the state, particularly benefits that advance resource protection and management.

(3) Demonstrated that no further collection of specimens or disturbance of state park system resources will be required for the
 commercial application identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Agreed to any other required terms and conditions of the department and paid any required application and administrative fees to the department.

(d) The department may set and collect application fees for permits and applications pursuant to this section and Section 5001.65 in amounts not to exceed the reasonable costs of the department.

(e) The department shall deposit fees collected pursuant to subdivision (d), the proceeds collected from a benefits sharing agreement entered into pursuant to this section, and moneys paid pursuant to subdivision (h), into the State Parks and Recreation Fund, to be available to the department, upon appropriation
 by the Legislature, for the
 management and restoration of natural resources of the state park system and administration of this section. It is the intent of the Legislature that any moneys deposited in the State Parks and Recreation Fund pursuant to this section are in addition to and do not supplant or replace any existing state funding for the operation and maintenance of the state park system.

(f) The department shall post, and update annually, information regarding approved commercialization applications, including the
 applicant’s name, the park unit affected, a brief description of the project permitted, and a summary of the benefits sharing agreement, on its internet website.

(g) Nothing in this section relieves any applicant from compliance with state and federal laws and regulations, including permit requirements.

(h) In addition to all other remedies in law or equity that the department may have, any person or entity that commercializes or seeks to commercialize
 investigation results obtained within the state park system without a director-approved benefits sharing agreement shall be required to pay 75 percent of gross revenue from the commercialization of the investigation results to the department.

(i) For purposes of this section, “investigation results” means the results of scientific research, scientific investigation, or the progeny of biological samples collected pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 477, Sec. 2.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.7.

The landing of aircraft in units of the state park system is subject to the following limitations:

(a) Airport facilities and services may be allowed in a unit of the state park system, other than a state wilderness, state reserve, natural preserve, or cultural preserve, if the department determines that it is desirable to expand visitor use of the unit and that the location of such facilities and services is compatible with the management of the unit in relation to its primary usage.

(b) Airport facilities and services shall be excluded from
 state wilderness, state reserves, natural preserves, and cultural preserves, and shall be excluded from any other unit of the state park system where the department determines that the primary resource value of the unit would be impaired by such facilities and services or that a landing strip or flight patterns would not be compatible with the recreation experience of other visitors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.8.

(a) The use of motor vehicles in units of the state park system is subject to the following limitations:

(1) In state wildernesses, natural preserves, and cultural preserves, use is prohibited.

(2) In state parks, state reserves, state beaches, wayside campgrounds, and historical units, use is confined to paved areas and other areas specifically designated and maintained for normal ingress, egress, and parking.

(3) In state recreation areas, use is confined to specifically designated and maintained roads and trails.

(b) The use of motor vehicles on lands in the state vehicular recreation areas is confined to areas and routes designated for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.9.

(a) Any improvement existing within the state park system as of January 1, 1979, which fails to comply with the provisions of former Section 5001.5 as they read immediately prior to January 1, 1979, or Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 5019.50) of this chapter shall not be expanded.

(b) No new facility may be developed in any unit of the state park system unless it is compatible with the classification of the unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.95.

No state park system unit, other than a state wilderness, a natural preserve, or a cultural preserve, shall be located within the boundaries of another state park system unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.96.

Attendance at state park system units shall be held within limits established by carrying capacity determined in accordance with Section 5019.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1722.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

All parks, public camp grounds, monument sites, landmark sites, and sites of historical interest established or acquired by the State, or which are under its control, constitute the State Park System except the sites and grounds known as the State Fair Grounds in the City of Sacramento, and Balboa Park in the City of San Diego.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.1.

Prior to the classification or reclassification of a unit of the state park system into any of the categories specified in Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 5019.50) of this chapter, the department shall prepare an inventory of the unit’s scenic, natural, and cultural features, including, but not limited to, ecological, archaeological, historical, and geological features. The inventory shall be submitted by the department to the State Park and Recreation Commission for its consideration when classifying or reclassifying a unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.2.

(a) (1) Following classification or reclassification of a unit by the State Park and Recreation Commission, and prior to the development of any new facilities in any previously classified unit, the department shall prepare a general plan or revise any existing plan for the unit.

(2) The general plan shall consist of elements that will evaluate and define the proposed land uses, facilities, concessions, operation of the unit, any environmental impacts, and the management of resources, and shall serve as a guide for the future development, management, and operation of the unit.

(3) The general plan constitutes a report on a project for the
 purposes of Section 21100. The general plan for a unit shall be submitted by the department to the State Park and Recreation Commission for approval.

(b) The resource element of the general plan shall evaluate the unit as a constituent of an ecological region and as a distinct ecological entity, based upon historical and ecological research of plant-animal and soil-geological relationships and shall contain a declaration of purpose, setting forth specific long-range management objectives for the unit consistent with the unit’s classification pursuant to Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 5019.50), and a declaration of resource management policy, setting forth the precise actions and limitations required for the achievement of the objectives established in the declaration of purpose.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department is not required to prepare a general plan for
 a unit that has no general plan or to revise an existing plan if the only development contemplated by the department consists of the repair, replacement, or rehabilitation of an existing facility; the construction of a temporary facility, if the construction does not result in the permanent commitment of a resource of the unit; any undertaking necessary for the protection of public health or safety; or any emergency measure necessary for the immediate protection of natural or cultural resources; or any combination of these activities at a single unit. Any development is subject to the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).
